Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission,
for the biennium beginning July 1,  2017, out of the General Fund, the following amounts for
the following purposes:
(1) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission operations ............. $ 21,315,378
(2) Public University Operations
and Student Support
for distribution to
public universities..................... $736,898,583
(3) Community College Support
Fund for distribution to
community colleges and
community college service
districts..................................... $570,263,942
(4) Skills Centers and Education
Support for distribution to
community colleges and
school districts .......................... $ 3,676,243
(5) Oregon Opportunity Grants ...... $125,217,521
(6) Oregon Promise Grants ............ $ 34,664,388
(7) Student Child Care Grants ....... $ 983,718
(8) Oregon Health and Science
University education and
rural programs.......................... $ 66,333,348
(9) Workforce programs ................. $ 8,144,577
(10) Public university statewide
programs................................... $ 39,726,110
(11) Agricultural Experiment
Station and the branch
Enrolled Senate Bill 5524 (SB 5524-A) Page 1
extension stations of
Oregon State University ........... $ 66,088,861
(12) Oregon State University
Extension Service ..................... $ 47,717,403
(13) Forest Research Laboratory
at Oregon State University ....... $ 10,224,041
(14) Oregon Health and Science
University Child Development
and Rehabilitation Center......... $ 8,290,972
(15) Oregon Health and Science
University hospitals and
clinics for operation of
Oregon Poison Center ............... $ 2,653,112
(16) Debt service and related costs:
(a) Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
pursuant to Article XI-G of
the Oregon Constitution for
the benefit of Oregon
community colleges ................... $ 32,118,011
(b) Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
pursuant to Article XI-G of
the Oregon Constitution for
the benefit of Oregon public
universities ............................... $ 85,846,748
(c) Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
pursuant to Article XI-G of
the Oregon Constitution for
the benefit of Oregon Health
and Science University ............. $ 598,400
(d) Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
pursuant to Article XI-Q of
the Oregon Constitution for
the benefit of Oregon public
universities ............................... $ 57,023,216
(e) Debt service on outstanding
certificates of participation
sold for the benefit of Oregon
public universities..................... $ 5,220,550
(f) Repayment of energy loans made
to Oregon public universities
by the State Department of
Energy....................................... $ 13,424,701
(g) Debt-related costs on bonds
sold for the benefit of
Oregon public universities ........ $ 216,773
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$31,921,630 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
Enrolled Senate Bill 5524 (SB 5524-A) Page 2
nomic Development Fund to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission for debt service
on lottery bonds sold for the benefit of Oregon public universities.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$11,733,159 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission for debt service
on lottery bonds sold for the benefit of Oregon community colleges.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$20,746,268 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Education  Stability Fund to the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission for Oregon Opportunity Grants.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$24,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Outdoor School Education Fund.
SECTION 6.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds, federal funds and funds  described in sections 9 and 10 of this 2017 Act,
collected or received by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for  the following
purposes:
(1) Operations.................................  $ 8,850,624
(2) Oregon Youth Conservation
Corps......................................... $ 2,625,635
(3) Debt service on Article
XI-G and XI-Q bonds
issued for the benefit of
Oregon public universities ........ $ 900,000
(4) Debt service on Article
XI-G bonds issued for
the benefit of Oregon
community colleges ................... $ 550,000
(5) Other programs ........................ $ 16,349,304
SECTION 7.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from federal funds  collected or received by the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 13,825,203
(2) Oregon Youth Conservation
Corps......................................... $ 1,210,721
(3) Other programs ........................ $ 99,470,153
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,500,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from bond proceeds and  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Re-
ceipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission from the proceeds of lottery bonds for  the purposes of
a grant to Linn-Benton Community College for the Advanced  Transportation Technology
Center.
SECTION 9.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$8,240,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery  moneys allocated to the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission from the Sports Lottery Account for the benefit of Oregon public universities.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5524 (SB 5524-A) Page 3
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $45,810
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission from  the moneys received
from the Western Oregon Timber Severance Tax  Fund and the Eastern Oregon Timber
Severance Tax Fund for the Community College Support Fund.
SECTION 11.
For the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, expenditures by the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission for debt service on general obligation bonds and certificates
of participation issued for the benefit of public universities and paid with  resources received
from the public universities are not limited.
SECTION 12. For the biennium beginning July 1,  2017, expenditures by the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission for payments to individuals, organizations  or units of gov-
ernment from federal National Emergency Grant funds are not limited.
SECTION 13. For the biennium beginning July 1,  2017, expenditures by the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission for federal funds  debt service on Build America Bonds sold
for the benefit of Oregon public universities and community colleges are not limited.
SECTION 14. For the biennium beginning July 1,  2017, expenditures by the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission of moneys from the Tuition Protection Fund are not limited.
SECTION 15. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by Senate July 4, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5524 (SB 5524-A) Page 4